Nebraska, session 109, LB837.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB837 LB837
2026 2026
Section 1. (1) Any person selling goods or services in a cash
transaction, entering into any transaction that results in a payment or
transfer of cash between the parties to the transaction, or paying cash
wages to an employee as compensation:
(a) Except as provided in subdivision (1)(c) of this section, in any
case in which the total transaction amount, including any taxes, ends
with one, two, six, or seven as the final digit of the number of cents
for the transaction, may round down such number of cents to the nearest
number of cents divisible by five;
(b) In any case in which the total transaction amount, including any
taxes, ends with three, four, eight, or nine as the final digit of the
number of cents for the transaction, may round up such number of cents to
the nearest number of cents divisible by five; and
(c) In any case in which the total transaction amount, including any
taxes, totals one cent or two cents, shall round up the transaction
amount to five cents.
(2) This section shall not apply to any transaction for which
payment is made by any demand or negotiable instrument, electronic fund
transfer, check, gift card, money order, credit card, or other similar
instrument or method.
-2-